Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 7. Removal of Trustees.

§§ 91-9-301 through 91-9-305.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 108, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§91-9-301. [Codes, 1942, § 1273-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 221, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1960).]

§91-9-303. [Codes, 1942, § 1273-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 221, § 2, from and after passage (approved March 31, 1960).]

§91-9-305. [Codes, 1942, § 1273-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 221, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1960).]